Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 5

1990 Bridge Grant Program Act

54-4-501. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “1990 Bridge Grant Program Act.”

Acts 1990, ch. 717, § 2.

Collateral References. Bridges
1 et seq.

54-4-502. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of transportation;

“Department” means the department of transportation; and

“Local government” means any county, incorporated city or town, and metropolitan form of government, or any of them.

Acts 1990, ch. 717, § 3.

54-4-503. Purpose.

The general assembly finds and declares it to be in the vital interest of the state that a highway bridge replacement and rehabilitation program be established to enable the local governments to replace or rehabilitate certain bridges within their respective jurisdictions when the commissioner finds that a bridge is structurally deficient or functionally obsolete.

Acts 1990, ch. 717, § 4.

54-4-504. Selection process — Eligibility.

The commissioner shall develop a selection process for projects authorized to be funded under this part, and, furthermore, shall establish the policies and procedures by which this program shall be accomplished.

Eligible bridges shall be those located on public roads, other than those on a federal-aid system or the state system of highways.

In order for a local government to be considered eligible for participation in this program, it must be in compliance with any department recommendations, concerning the posting and enforcement of load limits, and the closure of structures, based upon national bridge inspection standards. Whenever the commissioner determines that no local government within a county geographical area has taken necessary action to assure maximum utilization of the program, the county geographical area may be considered ineligible to participate in the following fiscal year.

Acts 1990, ch. 717, § 5.

54-4-505. Allocation of funds.

Subject to the conditions for local government participation set forth in this part, the allocation of funds appropriated to the 1990 bridge grant program each fiscal year shall be in accordance with the general appropriations act.

Acts 1990, ch. 717, § 6.

54-4-506. Expending allocated moneys for other roadway purposes.

Once the local governments within a county geographical area have addressed the project priorities established by the commissioner, application may be made to the commissioner for permission to expend moneys allocated to the area under this part for other roadway purposes. The commissioner must approve the expenditure, and may require that certain conditions be met in conjunction with the expenditure.

Acts 1990, ch. 717, § 7.

54-4-507. Maximum state share of project cost.

The state share payable for a project undertaken pursuant to this part shall be no more than eighty percent (80%) of the approved project cost.

The local government share shall be at least twenty percent (20%) of the approved project cost. This share may be provided by local government funds and in-kind project work approved by the commissioner, or either of them, wholly or partly.

The percentage in subsections (a) and (b) shall also apply to any unexpended balance from appropriations prior to 2004 that are not subject to a written agreement between the local government and the department. In the event there exists a written agreement between the department and the local government, then the percentage contained in the agreement shall continue to apply.

If any county has an unexpended balance of funds that have accrued in the state treasury and that are available for the benefit of the county under this part, then the county may use the unexpended balance, in whole or in part, to provide a portion of the local government share required by subsection (b); provided, that the county shall provide at least two percent (2%) of the approved project costs from county funds or in-kind project work approved by the commissioner of transportation, or both.

Acts 1990, ch. 717, § 8; 1994, ch. 572, § 1; 2004, ch. 512, §§ 2-4; 2014, ch. 573, § 2; 2016, ch. 981, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 573, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and cited as the “County Bridge Relief Act of 2014”.

Acts 2014, ch. 573, § 3 provided that nothing in this act shall be construed to be an appropriation of funds and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to this act unless such funds are specifically appropriated by the General Appropriations Act.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment, effective from March 28, 2014, until July 1, 2016, added (d) which read: “If any county has an unexpended balance of funds that have accrued in the state treasury and that are available for the benefit of the county under this part, then the county may use the unexpended balance, in whole or in part, to provide a portion of the local government share required by subsection (b); provided, that the county shall provide at least two percent (2%) of the approved project costs from county funds or in-kind project work approved by the commissioner of transportation, or both; provided, further, that the county shall initiate the project during fiscal years 2014-2015 or 2015-2016. This subsection (d) is deleted on July 1, 2016 and shall no longer be effective on and after such date.”

The 2016 amendment, in (d), deleted former (d)(2) which read: “(2) This subsection (d) is deleted on July 1, 2016 and shall no longer be effective on and after such date.”; and deleted “; provided, further, that the county shall initiate the project during fiscal years 2014-2015 or 2015-2016” from the end of present (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 573, § 4. March 28, 2014.

Acts 2016, ch. 981, § 2. April 27, 2016.

54-4-508. Project to be maintained by local government.

Any project undertaken pursuant to this part shall be maintained by the local government within whose jurisdiction the project lies.

Acts 1990, ch. 717, § 9; 1991, ch. 133, § 4.